North Carolina, session 2025, HB1049.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Triad Cultural
Arts, Inc., a nonprofit organization, to support improvements to the restored Shotgun House in
the City of Winston-Salem to further its purpose as serving as an immersive museum for students,
visitors, and community gatherings.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*H1049-v-1*